Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,111
Interstate bridges; closing for construction or maintenance.

The department shall have the power and authority to enter into agreements with the adjoining state concerned to determine the manner in which the whole or any part of any interstate bridge may be closed to traffic for purposes of construction or maintenance. Any such agreement shall determine the party or parties which shall have the authority to close the whole or any part of such bridges, and shall contain provisions not inconsistent with sections 39-891 to 39-8,122. In the absence of such an agreement, the department may close that portion of any interstate bridge located within the State of Nebraska under the authority of section 39-1345.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 21, p. 641.